Wyoming, session 2026, SF0112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-213(b), 31-2-219(d),
31-2-229(d), 31-2-231(d), 31-2-234(d), 31-2-235(c) and
31-3-102(a) by creating a new paragraph (xxiv) are amended
to read:

SF0112

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0487
31-2-213. Department to supply registration
certificates, plates and stickers; removable windshield
placards.

(b) The department may issue license plates, except
permanent, dealer and antique motor vehicle license plates,
which shall be valid, for not more than eight (8) years if
annual validation stickers are attached in the upper left
corner of the license plate with the month and year of
expiration clearly visible and until any number or letter
on either license plate is no longer readable or visible.
If a license plate, except a permanent, dealer and antique
motor vehicle license plate, is no longer readable or
visible as provided in this subsection, the owner of the
vehicle shall obtain two (2) replacement license plates
upon payment of the fee under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(xxiv) from
any county treasurer or the department if the vehicle was
registered and the license plates were issued by the
department. Replacement license plates issued under this
subsection shall bear the same identification number as the
initial license plates and shall replace both license
plates. Replacement license plates issued under this
subsection shall not be considered new license plates
SF0112

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0487
issued upon loss, mutilation or destruction under W.S.
31-2-212. For purposes of this subsection, "no longer
readable or visible" means that one (1) or more numbers or
letters on a license plate are permanently worn, faded,
corroded or damaged so the numbers or letters on a license
plate cannot clearly be identified under ordinary daylight
conditions and shall not include temporary obscuration
caused by snow, mud, ice or any other environmental
conditions. Department authorized license plates and annual
stickers shall be of colors that are readily
distinguishable from the previous year.

31-2-219. University of Wyoming license plates.

(d) The department shall prescribe the design of the
special license plate authorized by this section, which
shall include an image of the bucking horse and rider as
described in W.S. 8-3-117, in consultation with the
University of Wyoming, the University of Wyoming Alumni
Association and the secretary of state's office, and
arrange for production of the license plates. Following
initial approval, University of Wyoming plates shall be
subject to redesign on the same schedule as all license
SF0112

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0487
plates beginning with the year 2017 reissuance. The license
plates shall be issued by the county treasurer of each
county.

31-2-229. Special plates; gold star.

(d) The department shall prescribe the design of the
gold star license plate authorized by this section in
consultation with the Wyoming veteran's commission and
shall arrange for production of the license plates.
Following initial approval, the gold star license plates
shall be subject to redesign on the same schedule as all
license plates beginning with the year 2017 reissuance. The
license plates shall be issued by the county treasurer of
each county.

31-2-231. Wildlife conservation license plates;
wildlife conservation account; authority to receive and
expend monies.

(d) The department shall prescribe the design of the
wildlife conservation license plates authorized by this
section in consultation with the public and other
SF0112

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0487
interested parties, which shall include an image of the
bucking horse and rider described in W.S. 8-3-117. License
plates authorized by this section need not include Arabic
numerals designating the county. The department shall
arrange for production of the license plates. Following
initial approval, wildlife conservation license plates
shall be subject to redesign on the same schedule as all
license plates beginning with the year 2025 reissuance.

31-2-234. Search and rescue license plates.

(d) The department shall prescribe the design of the
search and rescue license plates authorized by this section
in consultation with the public and other interested
parties, which shall include an image of the bucking horse
and rider described in W.S. 8-3-117. License plates
authorized by this section need not include Arabic numerals
designating the county. The department shall arrange for
production of the license plates. Following initial
approval, search and rescue license plates shall be subject
to redesign on the same schedule as all license plates
beginning with the year 2033 reissuance.

SF0112

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0487
31-2-235. Rodeo license plates.

(c) The department shall prescribe the design of the
rodeo license plates authorized by this section. The rodeo
license plates shall be the same size as regular motor
vehicle license plates and need not include arabic numerals
for the county. The department shall include the following
language on the license plate: "Rodeo — The official sport
of Wyoming." The department shall arrange for production of
the license plates. Following initial approval, rodeo
license plates shall be subject to redesign on the same
schedule as all license plates beginning with the 2033
reissuance.

31-3-102. Miscellaneous fees.

(a) The following fees shall be collected for the
instruments or privileges indicated:

(xxiv) Replacement license plates:

SF0112

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0487
(A) Replacement license plates if an
initial license plate is no longer readable or visible as
provided in W.S. 31-2-213(b) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8.00

(B) Replacement license plates that have to
be produced for prestige, specialty and preferred number
series if an initial license plate is no longer readable or
visible as provided in W.S. 31-2-213(b) . . . . . . $30.00.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0112